apertium-sme-nob.nob.dix
<pardef n="ess__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_'__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="'__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_'__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="'__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sluttkommunik/é__n">
  <e>       <p><l>eene</l>      <r>é<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eer</l>       <r>é<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eet</l>       <r>é<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>é</l>         <r>é<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ea</l>        <r>é<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hend/e__n">
  <!-- wsd todo -->
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="rist__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hu/e__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="rekvisita__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="t/åg__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ægene</l>     <r>åg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æger</l>      <r>åg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åga</l>       <r>åg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åg</l>        <r>åg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ægene</l>     <r>åg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æger</l>      <r>åg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ågen</l>      <r>åg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åg</l>        <r>åg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="gifte">           <i>gift</i><par n="hu/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="lære">            <i>lær</i><par n="hu/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="tykke">           <i>tykk</i><par n="hu/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="yrke">            <i>yrk</i><par n="hu/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="leie">            <i>lei</i><par n="hu/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="følgje"><i>følgj</i><par n="hu/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="greie"><i>grei</i><par n="hu/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hende"><i>hend</i><par n="hend/e__n"/></e>
